Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-47] Penalties. In addition to
penalties that may be applicable under section 150A-14, certified importers are
subject to penalties as follows:

(1) A certified importer who violates any of the
foregoing sections in this part shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and,
notwithstanding section 706-640, shall be subject to a fine of not less than
$1,000 and not more than $10,000; and

(2) A certified importer who intentionally imports a
microorganism not allowed by the importer's certification with the intent to
propagate, sell, or release the microorganism shall be guilty of a class C
felony and, notwithstanding section 706-640, shall be subject to a fine of not
less than $50,000 but not more than $500,000. [L 1999, c 177, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next